Utah statutes.
39-6-87.   Delay in disposition of case or noncompliance with chapter.

A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs who:

(1)  is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this chapter; or

(2)  knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this chapter regulating the proceedings before, during, or after trial of an accused.

